Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2005.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5656YH (1) 91 jda/jh H.F. 2005 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 280.37 Education related to the 1 holocaust. 2 1. The general assembly finds all of the following: 3 a. Recent studies have shown there to be a severe lack 4 of awareness in the state of Iowa regarding historical facts 5 about the holocaust and antisemitism, and the causes and 6 ramifications thereof. 7 b. Antisemitism remains a persistent, pervasive, and 8 disturbing problem in contemporary American society. 9 c. In order to provide students with an understanding of the 10 importance of the protection of human rights and the potential 11 consequences of discrimination against and persecution of 12 Jewish people, it is a matter of high priority that students in 13 this state be educated concerning the holocaust. 14 d. Sources of free curricula and instructional materials for 15 education related to the holocaust include but are not limited 16 to the United States holocaust memorial museum; yad vashem: 17 the world holocaust remembrance center; the Illinois holocaust 18 museum and education center; and echoes and reflections, a 19 partnership of the anti-defamation league, yad vashem, and the 20 university of southern California shoah foundation. 21 2. For purposes of this section, unless the context 22 otherwise requires: 23 a. âAntisemitismâ means the same as defined in section 24 216F.1. 25 b. âHolocaustâ means the systematic, bureaucratic, 26 state-sponsored persecution and murder of approximately 27 six million Jews by the Nazi regime and its allies and 28 collaborators. 29 c. âNaziâ means the abbreviation for the national socialist 30 German workersâ party, a political party of the mass movement 31 known as national socialism under which its leader, Adolf 32 Hitler, came to power in 1933 and governed by totalitarian 33 methods until 1945. 34 d. âOrganizationâ means one or more of the following 35 -1- LSB 5656YH (1) 91 jda/jh 1/ 5 H.F. 2005 organizations: 1 (1) The United States holocaust memorial museum. 2 (2) Yad vashem: the world holocaust remembrance center. 3 (3) The Illinois holocaust museum and education center. 4 (4) Echoes and reflections, a partnership of the 5 anti-defamation league, yad vashem, and the university of 6 southern California shoah foundation. 7 (5) Any other entity approved for education on the holocaust 8 by the department of education. 9 3. a. No later than the school year beginning July 1, 2026, 10 the board of directors of a school district shall incorporate 11 age-appropriate and grade-appropriate instruction related to 12 the holocaust for students in middle and high school into the 13 school districtâs educational program. Such instruction shall 14 be incorporated into existing required courses and include, at 15 minimum, all of the following: 16 (1) The causes and ramifications of the holocaust. 17 (2) The breadth of the history of antisemitism and 18 the holocaust, including the third reich dictatorship, 19 concentration camp system, persecution of Jews and non-Jews, 20 Jewish and non-Jewish resistance, and post-World War II trials. 21 (3) The impact of personal responsibility, civic 22 engagement, and societal response in the context of the 23 holocaust. 24 (4) The connection between national, ethnic, racial, 25 or religious intolerance and the subjects described in 26 subparagraphs (1) and (2). 27 (5) The leading role played by the United States and 28 the United States armed forces, including African American 29 soldiers, including but not limited to the Tuskegee airmen, 30 as well as Native American and Asian American soldiers, in 31 defeating the third reich and its allies and liberating Nazi 32 concentration camps. 33 (6) The definition, history, and actions taken in the face 34 of the holocaust. 35 -2- LSB 5656YH (1) 91 jda/jh 2/ 5 H.F. 2005 b. School districts shall utilize appropriate public or 1 private materials, personnel, and other resources in developing 2 and implementing education related to the holocaust in 3 accordance with this section. 4 4. No later than the school year beginning July 1, 2026, 5 the board of directors of a school district shall incorporate 6 education related to the holocaust for teachers into the 7 district professional development plan developed pursuant to 8 section 284.6 for teachers who provide instruction in courses 9 into which student instruction in accordance with subsection 10 3 is incorporated. Such training shall cover the topics 11 required by subsection 3. School districts shall utilize 12 appropriate programs provided by an organization for such 13 training. Education related to the holocaust provided to 14 teachers in accordance with this section shall be credited 15 toward a teacherâs individual professional development plan 16 under section 284.6. 17 5. Annually by October 1, the department of education 18 shall submit a report to the governor and the general assembly 19 addressing the number of school districts offering education 20 related to the holocaust to students and teachers in accordance 21 with this section. The department shall publish the report on 22 the departmentâs internet site. 23 6. This section shall not be construed to diminish or 24 infringe upon any right protected under the Constitution of 25 the State of Iowa or the first amendment to the Constitution 26 of the United States. This section shall not be construed to 27 conflict with any local, state, or federal law relating to 28 discrimination. 29 Sec. 2. STATE MANDATE FUNDING SPECIFIED. In accordance 30 with section 25B.2, subsection 3, the state cost of requiring 31 compliance with any state mandate included in this Act shall 32 be paid by a school district from state school foundation aid 33 received by the school district under section 257.16. This 34 specification of the payment of the state cost shall be deemed 35 -3- LSB 5656YH (1) 91 jda/jh 3/ 5 H.F. 2005 to meet all of the state funding-related requirements of 1 section 25B.2, subsection 3, and no additional state funding 2 shall be necessary for the full implementation of this Act 3 by and enforcement of this Act against all affected school 4 districts. 5